Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.050

Claims against decedent—Time limits.

(1) If a notice agent provides notice under RCW 11.42.020, any person having a claim against the decedent is forever barred from making a claim or commencing an action against the decedent if the claim or action is not already barred by an otherwise applicable statute of limitations, unless the creditor presents the claim in the manner provided in RCW 11.42.070 within the following time limitations:

(a) If the notice agent provided notice under RCW 11.42.020(2) (a) and (b) and the creditor was given actual notice as provided in RCW 11.42.020(2)(c), the creditor must present the claim within the later of: (i) Thirty days after the notice agent's service or mailing of notice to the creditor; and (ii) four months after the date of first publication of the notice;

(b) If the notice agent provided notice under RCW 11.42.020(2) (a) and (b) and the creditor was not given actual notice as provided in RCW 11.42.020(2)(c):

(i) If the creditor was not reasonably ascertainable, as defined in RCW 11.42.040, the creditor must present the claim within four months after the date of first publication of the notice;

(ii) If the creditor was reasonably ascertainable, as defined in RCW 11.42.040, the creditor must present the claim within twenty-four months after the decedent's date of death.

(2) Any otherwise applicable statute of limitations applies without regard to the tolling provisions of RCW 4.16.190.

(3) This bar is effective as to claims against both the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets.

[ 1997 c 252 s 28; 1994 c 221 s 35.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.